Hawaii statutes.
[§338-4.5] Deaths reported to state
agencies. [Section repealed July 1, 2018. L 2016, c 85, §3.] (a)
Notwithstanding section 338-18, the department of health, within six weeks
after the end of each quarter or other agreed upon period, shall deliver to a
state agency a list of the names of all persons whose deaths have been recorded
by the department during that period; provided that this section shall only
apply to a state agency that:

(1) Maintains official lists of persons in the
ordinary course of the agency's activities and is prohibited by federal law
from sharing information from the lists; and

(2) Has requested the information from the department
pursuant to a written agreement.

The list shall set forth the full name of the
decedent, the dates of the decedent's birth and death, and the last four digits
of the decedent's social security number, if known. The department and the
requesting agency shall determine by agreement the form and format of providing
the information to the agency.

(b) In response to an agency's first request
pursuant to subsection (a), the department of health may provide a list of the
persons whose deaths were recorded by the department during an agreed upon
period in the past. The department may charge a reasonable fee to cover its
cost of providing the list. If a state agency requires further information,
the department may provide a certified copy of the death certificate to that
state agency, subject to the fees required under section 338-14.5.

(c) Any state agency that obtains, pursuant to
this section, a list of the names of persons whose deaths have been recorded by
the department of health shall use the list only for the purposes for which it
was obtained and shall not further disclose any information on the list.

(d) The department of health may develop and
implement or assist with the development and implementation of a systems
interface to electronically provide the information required pursuant to
subsection (a) to a state agency. [L 2014, c 27, §§2, 4; am L 2016, c 85, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next